Vermont, session 2025-2026, S166.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 1130 is amended to read:
§ 1130. IMMUNIZATION FUNDING
(a) As used in this section:
* * *
(4) “Immunizations Recommended immunization” means vaccines an
immunization and the application of the vaccines immunization as
recommended by the practice guidelines for children and adults established by
the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP) to the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) Commissioner pursuant to section
1130a of this title.
* * *
(b)(1) The Department of Health shall administer an immunization
program with the goals of ensuring universal access to vaccines recommended
immunizations for all Vermonters individuals domiciled in the State at no
charge to the individual and reducing the cost at which the State may purchase
vaccines recommended immunizations. The Department shall purchase,
provide for the distribution of, and monitor the use of vaccines recommended
immunizations as provided for in this subsection and subsection (c) of this
section. The cost of the vaccines recommended immunizations and an
VT LEG #385766 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.166
2026 Page 3 of 9
administrative surcharge shall be reimbursed by health insurers as provided for
in subsections (e) and (f) of this section.
(2) The Department shall solicit, facilitate, and supervise the
participation of health care professionals, health care facilities, and health
insurers in the immunization program in order to accomplish the State’s goal
of universal access to recommended immunizations at the lowest practicable
cost to individuals, insurers, and State health care programs.
(3) The Department shall gather and analyze data regarding the
immunization program for the purpose of ensuring its quality and maximizing
protection of Vermonters against diseases preventable by vaccination
immunization.
(c) The Department shall determine which recommended immunizations
shall be purchased under the program. The immunization program shall
purchase vaccines recommended immunizations from the federal Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention or another vendor at the lowest available cost
identified by the Department. The Department shall determine annually which
vaccines for adults shall be purchased under the program.
(d) The immunization program shall provide for distribution of the
vaccines recommended immunizations to health care professionals and health
care facilities for administration to patients.
VT LEG #385766 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.166
2026 Page 4 of 9
(e) Health insurers shall remit to the Department the cost of vaccines
recommended immunizations, as that cost is established by the Commissioner
of Health based on the recommendation of the Immunization Funding
Advisory Committee established in subsection (g) of this section.
(f) The Department shall charge each health insurer a surcharge for the
costs and administration of the immunization program. The surcharge shall be
deposited into an existing special fund and used solely for the purpose of
administering the program.
(g)(1) The Immunization Funding Advisory Committee is established to
provide the Commissioner of Health with an annual per-member per-month
cost for vaccines recommended immunizations for the pediatric population, an
annual per-member per-month cost for vaccines recommended immunizations
for the adult population, and a recommendation for the amount of the yearly
vaccine immunization assessment. The Committee shall comprise the
following nine members:
(A) the Executive Officer of the Board of Pharmacy;
(B) the Executive Director of the Green Mountain Care Board;
(C) a representative of the Vermont Blueprint for Health, nominated
by the Director of the Blueprint and appointed by the Commissioner of Health;
VT LEG #385766 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.166
2026 Page 5 of 9
(D) three representatives of health insurers, one from each of the
State’s largest private health insurers, as determined by the number of covered
lives, appointed by the Commissioner of Health;
(E) a representative of the American Academy of Pediatrics,
Vermont chapter, appointed by the Commissioner of Health;
(F) a representative of the American Academy of Family Medicine,
Vermont chapter, appointed by the Commissioner of Health; and
(G) a representative of employers that self-insure for health coverage,
appointed by the Commissioner of Health.
(2) The Committee shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting of each calendar year. The Committee shall receive
administrative support from the Department of Health.
(3) By January 1 of each year, the Committee shall provide to the
Commissioner the annual fiscal assessment and the per-member per-month
cost for pediatric vaccines recommended immunizations based on the total
number of pediatric covered lives reported by health insurers and the per-
member per-month cost for adult vaccines recommended immunizations based
on the total number of adult covered lives reported by health insurers.
(h) If federal purchase requirements do not further the goal of ensuring
universal access to vaccines recommended immunizations for all, the
Commissioner may, following consultation with the Immunization Funding
VT LEG #385766 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.166
2026 Page 6 of 9
Advisory Committee, discontinue the program with six months’ advance
notice to all health care professionals and to all health insurers with Vermont
covered lives.
(i) The Department may adopt rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
implement this section.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 1130a is added to read:
§ 1130a. RECOMMENDED IMMUNIZATIONS
(a) The Commissioner shall periodically issue recommendations regarding:
(1) which immunizations children and adults should receive;
(2) the recommended age at which each immunization should be given;
(3) the number of immunization doses that should be administered;
(4) the amount of time between doses of an immunization; and
(5) any other recommendations regarding immunizations necessary to
ensure the maintenance of public health and disease prevention in the State.
(b) Prior to issuing recommendations under subsection (a) of this section,
the Commissioner shall:
(1) consult with the Vermont Immunization Advisory Council,
established under section 1131 of this title; and
(2) consider recommendations for immunizations issued by the Centers
for Disease Control and Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization
Practices (ACIP), the American Academy of Pediatrics (AAP), the American
VT LEG #385766 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.166
2026 Page 7 of 9
Academy of Family Physicians (AAFP), the American College of
Obstetricians and Gynecologists (ACOG), the American College of Physicians
(ACP), and any other organizations the Commissioner may deem necessary.
(c) A health care professional who prescribes, dispenses, or administers an
immunization in accordance with the recommendations issued pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section shall be immune from civil and administrative
liability for immunization-caused adverse events, unless the health care
professional’s actions regarding prescribing, dispensing, or administering an
immunization constituted gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional
misconduct.
(d) The Commissioner may issue a standing order authorizing health care
professionals, including pharmacists, to prescribe, dispense, or administer
recommended immunizations, or any combination thereof, to the extent that
prescribing, dispensing, or administering recommended immunizations is
within the scope of the health care professional’s scope of practice.
(e) As used in this section, “health care professional” and “recommended
immunization” have the same meanings as in section 1130 of this title.
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 1131 is amended to read:
§ 1131. VERMONT IMMUNIZATION ADVISORY COUNCIL
(a) Creation. There is created the Vermont Immunization Advisory
Council for the purpose of providing education policy, medical, and
VT LEG #385766 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.166
2026 Page 8 of 9
epidemiological expertise and advice to the Department with regard to the
safety of immunizations and immunization schedules.
(b) Membership. The Council shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) a representative of the Vermont Board of Medical Practice,
appointed by the Governor;
(2) the Secretaries of Human Services and of Education or their
designees;
(3) the State epidemiologist or designee;
(4) the Department of Health’s Immunization Program Manager or
designee;
(5) a practicing pediatrician licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or
33, appointed by the Governor;
(6) two individuals who are professors, researchers, or physicians
licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 33, or any combination these
individuals, with expertise in infectious disease and human immunizations,
appointed by the Governor;
(7) a family or internal medicine physician licensed pursuant to 26
V.S.A. chapter 23 or 33, appointed by the Governor;
(5)(8) a representative of both public and independent schools,
appointed by the Governor; and
VT LEG #385766 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.166
2026 Page 9 of 9
(6)(9) any other persons deemed necessary by the Commissioner.
(c) Powers and duties Duties. The Council shall:
(1) review and make recommendations regarding the State’s
immunization schedule for attendance in schools and child care facilities; and
(2) provide any other advice and expertise requested by the
Commissioner, including advice regarding immunization recommendations
issued by the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1130a(a) of this title.
(d) Assistance. The Council shall have the administrative, technical, and
legal assistance of the Department.
(e) Meetings.
(1) The Council shall convene at the call of the Commissioner, but no
less than once each year.
(2) The Council shall select a chair from among its members at the first
meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385766 v.1